Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-216 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Country of origin” means the country where the animal was


born, raised, and slaughtered;


2. “Meat” means any part of the carcass or product derived from


cattle, goats, poultry, sheep, and swine that is sold for human


consumption; and


3. “Retail sale” means the sale of meat products to be consumed


directly by the consumer.



Req. No. 2699 Page 1


B. Any meat product sold at retail within this state shall be


labeled with its country of origin.


C. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall promulgate rules to enforce this section, including rules for


destroying any meat product incorrectly labeled or adulterated.


D. Any retailer found noncompliant with the provisions of this


section shall be subject to penalties prescribed by the Department.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2699 YG 1/15/2026 10:37:06 AM





























Req. No. 2699 Page 2